Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement Benefits
47-3-91.
Credit for service for visiting scholars.

As used in this Code section, the term “public college or university” means a college or university or other educational institution which is operated by or is under the control and management of a government or an agency or political subdivision of a government and which depends on government funds as a primary source of financial support.

Any member who was or is granted a leave of absence from a unit of the University System of Georgia to accept appointment as a visiting scholar to give lectures or teach at a public college or university located inside or outside the United States shall be entitled to obtain creditable service under this chapter for the period of time spent as a visiting scholar, subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section.

Any creditable service obtained pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall be subject to the following conditions and requirements:

No more than two years of creditable service may be obtained under this Code section;

No member who receives or who is or will become entitled to receive any annuity or pension or retirement benefit from any other source, except social security, shall be eligible to obtain creditable service under this Code section;

No creditable service obtained under this Code section shall be applied to obtain creditable service under Code Section 47-3-89, and no person shall be entitled to obtain more than a total of ten years of creditable service pursuant to this Code section and Code Section 47-3-89; and

The member must pay employer and employee contributions which would have been paid to the retirement system during the period of time claimed as creditable service based on the member’s earnable compensation at the time of making application for creditable service plus regular interest thereon compounded annually from the time the service as a visiting scholar was rendered until the date of payment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 506, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1.

47-3-92.
Absence from employment because of sick leave; creditable service.

For purposes of this Code section, the maximum amount of sick leave which may be accumulated in one year shall be one and one-fourth days per month of actual service. In the event any employer authorizes sick leave in excess of such amount, any such leave used in any year shall be deducted from the maximum amount of leave authorized for that year by this Code section. Nothing in this Code section shall require any employer to grant any certain amount of sick leave.

Accumulated days of sick leave accrued on, after, or before July 1, 1998, for which a member has not been paid shall constitute creditable service as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. Such creditable service may be used to qualify for retirement but may not be used to qualify for vesting for benefits. Upon retirement of a member, the employer shall certify to the board of trustees the total amount of that member’s sick leave based on leave records. It shall be the duty of each employer to maintain accurate records reflecting sick leave used and accumulated by each employee and to keep such records for at least 50 years.

A member shall be given such creditable service, not to exceed one month of creditable service for each 20 days of sick leave, in direct relation to appropriations provided by the General Assembly to fund the provisions of this subsection together with any increase in employer contributions made pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, provided that the member has a minimum of three months of such unused sick leave.

In order to fund the provisions of this Code section in whole or in part, the board of trustees is authorized, but not required, to increase the amount of employer contribution in direct proportion to the amount shown in the appropriation Acts enacted for such purpose by the General Assembly.

The board of trustees may adopt rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Code section, to aid in administering and carrying out the provisions of this Code section. The board of trustees is further authorized to adopt rules for awarding creditable service as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section in instances in which accurate records have not been kept based upon statistical experience in instances in which accurate records have been kept.

The creditable service provided by this Code section shall be available only to persons who retire on or after July 1, 1998.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 2, provides that this Code section shall become effective incrementally as funding is approved. Provision was made for concurrent funding at 50 percent.

47-3-93.
Additional creditable service for members with at least 25 years of creditable service.

Any member of this retirement system who has accrued at least 25 years of creditable service may obtain up to an additional three years of creditable service as provided in this Code section. In order to obtain such additional creditable service, the member must:

Make application to the board of trustees in such manner as the board deems appropriate; and

Pay to the board of trustees an amount determined by the board of trustees to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service as provided in this Code section.

Such application and payment must be made in conjunction with and simultaneously with the member’s application for retirement. If the application for retirement is withdrawn or denied, the application to purchase creditable service shall be void.

Upon receipt of an application for additional creditable service, the board of trustees shall certify to the applicant the amount of the payment required by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 526, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, § 7/HB 969.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, added the ending undesignated paragraph in subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, Code Section 47-3-93, as enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1218, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-3-94.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 526, § 1, which enacted this Code section, purported to amend Article 5 of Chapter 32 of Title 47 but actually amended Article 5 of Chapter 3 of Title 47.

47-3-94.
[Reserved] Credit for service while employed by nonprofit corporation under contract with state agency; requirements.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 47, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-3-94

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1218, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-95.
Credit for service in private schools.

A member who has completed at least five consecutive years of membership service in the public schools of Georgia or the University System of Georgia immediately prior to applying may obtain up to ten years of creditable service for service as a teacher in a private elementary or secondary school or any private college or university located in the state accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools, the Georgia Accrediting Association, or a nationally recognized accrediting agency by the State Board of Education. Such service credit shall be allowed on the basis of one year of credit for such service for each additional year of membership service in the public schools of Georgia or the University System of Georgia. A member wishing to obtain such creditable service shall provide documentation and pay to the board of trustees such amount as determined by the actuary as necessary to grant such benefit without creating any accrued actuarial liability as to this retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1218, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, Code Section 47-3-94, as enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1218, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-3-95.